New Jersey, session 221, S3096.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The State Board of Education shall adopt New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Social Studies and English Language Arts on Latino and Hispanic American history. b. A board of education shall include instruction on the history and contributions of Latino and Hispanic Americans in an appropriate place in the curriculum of students in grades kindergarten through 12 as part of the school district's implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Social Studies and English Language Arts.  The instruction shall be historically accurate, culturally relevant, community-based, contemporary, and developmentally appropriate. c. The Commissioner of Education shall provide professional development resources to teachers and administrators relating to the curriculum required pursuant to this section. d.   The commissioner, in consultation with the Commission on Latino and Hispanic Heritage established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2019, c.321 (C.18A:4-48), shall provide school districts with sample learning activities and resources that may be used to support implementation of the instructional requirement. 2.   This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.